Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
INDICTMENTS AND INFORMATIONS

16-5-201. Indictments - allegations - form.

Every indictment or accusation of the grand jury shall be deemed sufficient technically and correct which states the offense in the terms and language of the statute defining it, including either conjunctive or disjunctive clauses, or so plainly that the nature of the offense may be easily understood by the jury. Pleading in either the conjunctive or the disjunctive shall place a defendant on notice that the prosecution may rely on any or all of the alternatives alleged. The commencement of the indictment shall be in substance as follows:

STATE OF COLORADO
)
)
ss.
County of.................................................)
Of the ........ term of the ........ court, in the year ........ . The grand jurors chosen, selected, and sworn, in and for the county of .........., in the name and by the authority of the people of the state of Colorado, upon their oaths, present. (Here insert the offense, the name of the person charged, and the time and place of committing the same, with reasonable certainty.) Every indictment shall be signed by the foreman of the grand jury returning it and by the prosecuting attorney, his or her assistant, or his or her deputy.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 214, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-201.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 972, § 1, effective April 17.

16-5-202. Requisites of information - form.

The information is sufficient if it can be understood therefrom:

That it is presented by the person authorized by law to prosecute the offense;

That the defendant is identified therein, either by name or by the defendant's patterned chemical structure of genetic information, or described as a person whose name is unknown to the informant;

That the offense was committed within the jurisdiction of the court or is triable therein;

That the offense charged is set forth with such degree of certainty that the court may pronounce judgment upon a conviction.

The information may be in the following form:

An information may be filed using the language of the statute defining the offense, including either conjunctive or disjunctive clauses. Pleading in either the conjunctive or the disjunctive shall place a defendant on notice that the prosecution may rely on any or all of the alternatives alleged.

A court shall not refuse to accept a complaint or information that contains the requirements of this section.

STATE OF COLORADO
)
)
ss.
County of.................................................)
In the ........ Court ........ The People of the State of Colorado, against ........ A ........ B ........ C ........ D ........, district attorney within and for the .......... judicial district of the state of Colorado, in the county of .......... in the state aforesaid, in the name and by the authority of the people of the state of Colorado, informs the court that A ........ B ........ on the ........ day of ......... A.D. 20 ...., at the said county of .........., did (here state the offense) against the peace and dignity of the people of the state of Colorado.
C .............................................
D ............................................
District Attorney.
or C ....................... D ......................, District Attorney,
by H ...................... M ......................, Deputy.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 214, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-202.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 454, § 13, effective April 24.

L. 2003:

(3) and (4) added, p. 972, § 2, effective April 17.

16-5-203. Furnishing witnesses' names.

Whether a prosecution is commenced by indictment, information, or felony complaint, the district attorney shall make available to the defendant not later than twenty-one days after the defendant's first appearance at the time of or following the filing of charges a written list of the names and addresses of the witnesses then known to the district attorney whom he or she intends to call upon at trial. The district attorney shall also furnish the defendant in writing prior to trial the names and addresses of any additional witnesses who have become known to him or her prior to trial and whom he or she intends to call upon at trial, but this shall not preclude the calling of witnesses whose names or the materiality of whose testimony are first learned by the district attorney upon the trial. However, the court may, in its discretion, enter an order that denies the disclosure to the defendant of the names and addresses of witnesses, or that requires the defense counsel not to disclose such information to the defendant, subject to rule 16 part I (d)(2) and part III (d) of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure. The names and addresses of witnesses who are the subject of the order may be withheld pending a ruling of the court, but the prosecution shall notify the defense counsel in writing that a motion to withhold witness information has been filed and that such information will be withheld pending the court's order. Where the defendant has not had or waived a preliminary hearing, there shall be filed with the information the affidavit of some credible person verifying the information upon the personal knowledge of the affiant that the offense was committed.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 215, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-203.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 985, § 5, effective April 24.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 464, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 737, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 848, § 70, effective July 1.

16-5-204. Witnesses before a grand jury - procedure.

Whenever a witness in any proceeding before any grand jury refuses, without just cause shown, to comply with an order of the court to testify or provide other information, including any book, paper, document, record, recording, or other material, the prosecuting attorney may submit an application to the court for an order directing the witness to show why the witness should not be held in contempt. After submission of such application and a hearing at which the witness may be represented by counsel, the court may, if the court finds that such refusal was without just cause, hold the witness in contempt and order the witness to be confined. Such confinement shall continue until such time as the witness is willing to give such testimony or provide such information; however, the court may release the witness from confinement if the court determines that further confinement will not cause the witness to give such testimony or provide such information. No period of such confinement shall exceed the term of the grand jury, including extensions, before which such refusal to comply with the court order occurred, and in no event shall such confinement exceed six months.

If a witness has been confined in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), he or she may, upon petition filed with the court, request a hearing to be held within fourteen days to review the contempt order at which hearing he or she shall have the right to be represented by counsel. The court, at the hearing, may rescind, modify, or affirm the order.

In any proceeding conducted under this section, counsel may be appointed for a person financially unable to obtain adequate assistance.

(1.5) (a) Upon verified application of the prosecuting attorney stating that a witness was lawfully served with a subpoena to appear and testify before the grand jury and that the witness failed to appear in accordance with such subpoena, the court shall issue a warrant commanding any peace officer to bring the witness without unnecessary delay before the court for a hearing on the matters set forth in the application and to determine whether the witness should be held in contempt pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Upon issuance of the warrant, the court may fix an appropriate bond and direct, as a condition of the bond, that the witness appear on a date and at a time certain for the hearing.

No person who has been imprisoned or fined by a court for refusal to testify or provide other information concerning any criminal incident or incidents in any proceeding before a grand jury impaneled before any district court shall again be imprisoned or fined for a subsequent refusal to testify or provide other information concerning the same criminal incident or incidents before any grand jury.

Upon impanelment of each grand jury, the court shall give to such grand jury adequate and reasonable written notice of and shall assure that the grand jury reasonably understands the nature of:

Its duty to inquire into offenses against the criminal laws of the state of Colorado alleged to have been committed;

Its right to call and interrogate witnesses;

Its right to request the production of documents or other evidence;

The subject matter of the investigation and the criminal statutes or other statutes involved, if these are known at the time the grand jury is impaneled;

The duty of the grand jury by an affirmative vote of nine or more members of the grand jury to determine, based on the evidence presented before it, whether or not there is probable cause for finding indictments and to determine the violations to be included in any such indictments; and

The requirement that the grand jury may not find an indictment in cases of perjury unless at least two witnesses to the same fact present evidence establishing probable cause to find such an indictment.

At the option of the prosecuting attorney, a grand jury subpoena may contain an advisement of rights. If the prosecuting attorney determines that an advisement is necessary, the grand jury subpoena shall contain the following advisement prominently displayed on the front of the subpoena:

You have the right to retain an attorney to represent you and to advise you regarding your grand jury appearance.

Anything you say to the grand jury may be used against you in a court of law.

You have the right to refuse to answer questions if you feel the answers would tend to incriminate you or to implicate you in any illegal activity.

If you cannot afford or obtain an attorney, you may request the court to appoint an attorney to consult with or represent you.

Any witness who is not advised of his rights pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall not be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he testifies or any evidence he produces, nor shall any such testimony or evidence be used as evidence in any criminal proceeding, except for perjury, against him in any court.

Repealed.

Any witness subpoenaed to appear and testify before a grand jury or to produce books, papers, documents, or other objects before such grand jury shall be entitled to assistance of counsel during any time that such witness is being questioned in the presence of such grand jury, and counsel may be present in the grand jury room with his client during such questioning. However, counsel for the witness shall be permitted only to counsel with the witness and shall not make objections, arguments, or address the grand jury. Such counsel may be retained by the witness or may, for any person financially unable to obtain adequate assistance, be appointed in the same manner as if that person were eligible for appointed counsel. An attorney present in the grand jury room shall take an oath of secrecy. If the court, at an in camera hearing, determines that counsel was disruptive, then the court may order counsel to remain outside the courtroom when advising his client. No attorney shall be permitted to provide counsel in the grand jury room to more than one witness in the same criminal investigation, except with the permission of the grand jury.

Once a grand jury has returned a no true bill based upon a transaction, set of transactions, event, or events, a grand jury inquiry into the same transaction or events shall not be initiated unless the court finds, upon a proper showing by the prosecuting attorney, that the prosecuting attorney has discovered additional evidence relevant to such inquiry.

An authorized reporter shall be present at all grand jury sessions. All grand jury proceedings and testimony from commencement to adjournment shall be reported. The reporter's notes and any transcripts which may be prepared shall be preserved, sealed, and filed with the court. No release or destruction of the notes or transcripts shall occur without prior court approval.

Upon application by the prosecutor, or by any witness after notice to the prosecutor, the court, for good cause, may enter an order to furnish to that witness a transcript of his own grand jury testimony, or minutes, reports, or exhibits relating to them.

Any witness summoned to testify before a grand jury, or an attorney for such witness with the witness's written approval, shall be entitled, prior to testifying, to examine and copy at the witness's expense any statement in the possession of the prosecuting attorney or the grand jury which such witness has made to any law enforcement or prosecution official or under an oath required by law that relates to the subject matter under inquiry by the grand jury. If a witness is proceeding in forma pauperis, he shall be furnished, upon request, a copy of such transcript and shall not pay a fee.

No person subpoenaed to testify or to produce books, papers, documents, or other objects in any proceeding before any grand jury shall be required to testify or to produce such objects, or be confined as provided in this section, for his failure to so testify or produce such objects if, upon filing a motion and upon an evidentiary hearing before the court which issued such subpoena or a court having jurisdiction under this section, the court finds that:

A primary purpose or effect of requiring such person to so testify or to produce such objects before the grand jury is or will be to secure testimony for trial for which the defendant has already been charged by information, indictment, or criminal complaint;

Compliance with a subpoena would be unreasonable or oppressive;

A primary purpose of the issuance of the subpoena is to harass the witness;

The witness has already been confined, imprisoned, or fined under this section for his refusal to testify before any grand jury investigating the same transaction, set of transactions, event, or events; or

The witness has not been advised of his rights as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4).

Any grand jury may indict a person for an offense when the evidence before such grand jury provides probable cause to believe that such person committed such offense.

The district court before which the indicted defendant is to be tried shall dismiss any indictment of the grand jury if such district court finds, upon the filing of a motion by the indicted defendant based upon the grand jury record without argument or further evidence, that the grand jury finding of probable cause is not supported by the record.

Any person may approach the prosecuting attorney or the grand jury and request to testify or retestify in an inquiry before a grand jury or to appear before a grand jury. The prosecuting attorney or the grand jury shall keep a record of all denials of such requests to that prosecuting attorney or grand jury, including the reasons for not allowing such person to testify or appear. If the person making such request is dissatisfied with the decision of the prosecuting attorney or the grand jury, such person may petition the court for hearing on the denial by the prosecuting attorney or the grand jury. If the court grants the hearing, then the court may permit the person to testify or appear before the grand jury, if the court finds that such testimony or appearance would serve the interests of justice.

The foreman, or acting foreman when designated by the court, of the grand jury may swear or affirm all witnesses who come before the grand jury.

Any other motions testing the validity of the indictment may be heard by the court based only on the record and argument of counsel, unless there is cause shown for the need for additional evidence.

NOTICE

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 215, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-204.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 853, § 1, effective June 21.

L. 81:

(4)(c) repealed, p. 926, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(4)(f) amended, p. 623, § 15, effective April 2.

L. 2000:

(4)(h) amended, p. 428, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2002:

(1.5) added, p. 759, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(4)(a) amended, (HB-1310), ch. 268, p. 1393, § 6, effective June 7; (1)(b) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 849, § 71, effective July 1.

16-5-205. Informations - authority to file - indictments - warrants and summons.

The prosecuting attorney may file an information in the court having jurisdiction over the offense charged, alleging that a person committed the criminal offense described therein. The court shall enter an order fixing the amount of bail, if the offense is bailable, and the amount of bail shall be endorsed upon any warrant issued for the arrest of the alleged offender. When a summons is issued instead of a warrant, no bail shall be fixed; except that, when a person is charged with an offense pursuant to section 42-2-138 (1)(d) or 42-4-1301 (1) or (2)(a), C.R.S., the court may enter an order fixing the amount of bail even if a summons is issued.

Upon the return of an indictment by a grand jury, or the filing of an information, or the filing of a felony complaint in the county court, the prosecuting attorney shall request the court to order that a warrant shall issue for the arrest of the defendant, or that a summons shall issue and be served upon the defendant. If a warrant is requested upon an information or a felony complaint, the information or felony complaint must contain, or be accompanied by, a sworn written statement of facts establishing probable cause to believe that the criminal offense was committed as alleged by the person for whom the warrant is sought. In lieu of such sworn statement, the information or felony complaint may be supplemented by sworn testimony of such facts. Such testimony must be transcribed and then signed under oath by the witness giving the testimony.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any information, indictment, felony complaint, warrant, or summons shall comply with the requirements of applicable rules of criminal procedure adopted by the supreme court of Colorado. Any procedures connected with service of summons, the arrest and detention of an alleged offender upon a warrant, and the duties of the arresting officer relating to the summons or arrest, not specifically set forth in this code, shall be as provided by the applicable rules of criminal procedure adopted by the supreme court of Colorado.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 215, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-205.

L. 77:

(4) added, p. 856, § 2, effective June 21.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 779, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 402, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 97:

(4) repealed, p. 315, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 785, § 1, effective July 1.

16-5-205.5. Grand jury reports.

In any case in which a grand jury does not return an indictment, the grand jury may prepare or ask to be prepared a report of its findings if the grand jury determines that preparation and release of a report would be in the public interest, as described in subsection (5) of this section. The determination to prepare and release a report pursuant to this section must be made by an affirmative vote of at least the number of jurors that would have been required to return an indictment. The report shall be accompanied by certification that the grand jury has determined that release of the report is in the public interest, as described in subsection (5) of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in any instance in which the prosecuting attorney chooses to file charges against the person or business that was the subject of the grand jury investigation.

Within fourteen days after receiving a report of the grand jury prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall notify in writing all persons and businesses named in the grand jury report to give such persons and businesses an opportunity to review the grand jury report and prepare a response to be submitted to the court with the grand jury report. Such notice shall be by personal service or by certified mail return receipt requested. Any responses shall be submitted to the prosecuting attorney within fourteen days after notification.

Upon completion of the time for submitting responses, the prosecuting attorney shall submit the grand jury report to the court, together with the certification of public interest and any responses that may have been submitted. The court shall examine the report and make an order accepting and filing the report, including the certification and any responses that the respondent, by written notice to the prosecuting attorney and the court, has agreed to release, as a public record only if the court is satisfied that:

The grand jury and the prosecuting attorney were acting within the statutory jurisdiction of such persons in convening the grand jury; and

The grand jury foreman and the prosecuting attorney have verified on the record that:

The certification of public interest by the grand jury complies with the provisions of subsection (5) of this section; and

The report is based on facts revealed in the course of the grand jury investigation and is supported by a preponderance of the evidence; and

The report does not contain material the sole effect of which is to ridicule or abuse a person or business or to subject such person or business to public disgrace or embarrassment; and

The report does not contain material that is personal in nature that does not relate to any lawful inquiry; and

No confidentiality agreement will be violated and the identity of no confidential informant will be disclosed in making such grand jury report public; and

The filing of such report as a public record does not prejudice the fair consideration of a criminal matter.

Release of a grand jury report pursuant to this section may be deemed to be in the public interest only if the report addresses one or more of the following:

Allegations of the misuse or misapplication of public funds;

Allegations of abuse of authority by a public servant, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(o), C.R.S., or a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101;

Allegations of misfeasance or malfeasance with regard to a governmental function, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(j), C.R.S.;

Allegations of commission of a class 1, class 2, or class 3 felony.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 313, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5)(b) amended, p. 1614, § 8, effective August 6.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 849, § 72, effective July 1.

16-5-206. Summons in lieu of warrant.

Except in class 1, class 2, and class 3 felonies, level 1 and level 2 drug felonies, and in unclassified felonies punishable by a maximum penalty of more than ten years, if an indictment is returned or an information, felony complaint, or complaint has been filed prior to the arrest of the person named as defendant therein, the court has power to issue a summons commanding the appearance of the defendant in lieu of a warrant for his or her arrest unless a law enforcement officer presents in writing a basis to believe there is a significant risk of flight or that the victim or public safety may be compromised.

(1.5) (a) Except in class 1, class 2, class 3, and class 4 felonies; in crimes described in section 24-4.1-302 (1), C.R.S.; and in unclassified felonies punishable by a maximum penalty of more than ten years, a law enforcement officer may issue a summons commanding the appearance of the defendant in lieu of a warrant for his or her arrest based on probable cause if:

The local district attorney consents to such procedure and has developed and approved criteria for the issuance of such a summons pursuant to this subsection (1.5);

There is a reasonable likelihood that the defendant will appear;

The defendant has had no felony arrests during the preceding five years;

There is no allegation that the defendant used a deadly weapon as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(e), C.R.S., in the commission of the crime; and

There are no outstanding warrants for the defendant's arrest.

No later than ten days after a law enforcement officer issues a summons pursuant to this subsection (1.5), he or she shall deliver a copy to the court and to the office of the district attorney where jurisdiction lies.

When the procedure described in this subsection (1.5) is used, an information or complaint may be filed in open court on the date specified in the summons.

If a summons is issued in lieu of a warrant under this section:

It shall be in writing.

It shall state the name of the person summoned and his address.

It shall identify the nature of the offense.

It shall state the date when issued and the county where issued.

It shall be signed by the judge or clerk of the court with the title of his office or by the law enforcement officer who issued the summons.

It shall command the person to appear before the court at a certain time and place.

Repealed.

A summons issued under this section may be served in the same manner as the summons in a civil action or by mailing it to the defendant's last-known address by certified mail with return receipt requested not less than fourteen days prior to the time the defendant is requested to appear. Service by mail is complete upon the return of the receipt signed by the defendant.

If any person summoned under this section fails to appear as commanded by the summons, the court shall forthwith issue a warrant for his arrest.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 216, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-206.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1262), ch. 104, p. 381, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 849, § 73, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1928, § 38, effective October 1.

L. 2016:

(1.5) added and IP(2) and (2)(e) amended, (HB 16-1104), ch. 118, p. 337, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(2)(g) added, (SB 19-036), ch. 293, p. 2687, § 5, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(2)(g) repealed, (SB 22-018), ch. 191, p. 1274, § 5, effective July 15.

16-5-207. Standards and criteria relating to issuance of summons in lieu of warrant.

A summons shall be issued instead of a warrant in all petty offenses and all unclassified offenses which are punishable by a maximum penalty of six months' imprisonment or less, except in those cases where the court finds that:

The defendant has previously failed to respond to a summons for an offense; or

There is a substantial likelihood that the defendant will not respond to a summons; or

The whereabouts of the defendant is unknown and the issuance of an arrest warrant is necessary in order to subject him to the jurisdiction of the court.

Except in class 1, class 2, and class 3 felonies or level 1 or level 2 drug felonies, the general policy shall favor issuance of a summons instead of a warrant for the arrest of the defendant except where there is reasonable ground to believe that, unless taken into custody, the defendant will flee to avoid prosecution or will fail to respond to a summons. The court shall issue a summons instead of an arrest warrant when the prosecuting attorney so requests. When an application is made to a court for issuance of an arrest warrant or summons, the court may require the applicant to provide such information as reasonably is available concerning the following:

The defendant's residence;

The defendant's employment;

The defendant's family relationships;

The defendant's past history of response to legal process; and

The defendant's past criminal record.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 216, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-207.

L. 2013:

IP(2) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1928, § 39, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3163, § 171, effective March 1, 2022.

16-5-208. Information not filed - reasons.

In all cases where on preliminary hearing in the county court concerning the commission of a felony the accused is bound over and is committed to jail, or recognized and held to bail, it is the duty of the district attorney to file an information in the district court. If the district attorney determines in any such case that an information ought not to be filed, he or she shall file with the clerk of the district court having jurisdiction of the supposed offense a written statement containing his or her reasons, in fact and in law, for not filing an information in the case, and such statement shall be filed within sixty-three days following the date upon which the offender was held for appearance.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 217, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-208.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 849, § 74, effective July 1.

16-5-209. Judge may require prosecution.

The judge of a court having jurisdiction of the alleged offense, upon affidavit filed with the judge alleging the commission of a crime and the unjustified refusal of the prosecuting attorney to prosecute any person for the crime, may require the prosecuting attorney to appear before the judge and explain the refusal. If after that proceeding, based on the competent evidence in the affidavit, the explanation of the prosecuting attorney, and any argument of the parties, the judge finds that the refusal of the prosecuting attorney to prosecute was arbitrary or capricious and without reasonable excuse, the judge may order the prosecuting attorney to file an information and prosecute the case or may appoint a special prosecutor to do so. The judge shall appoint the special prosecutor from among the full-time district attorneys, assistant district attorneys, or deputy district attorneys who serve in judicial districts other than where the appointment is made; except that, upon the written approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, the judge may appoint any disinterested private attorney who is licensed to practice law in the state of Colorado to serve as the special prosecutor. Any special prosecutor appointed pursuant to this section shall be compensated as provided in section 20-1-308, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 217, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-209.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 454, § 12, effective April 24.